Utah statutes.
59-10-1318.   Contribution to Invest More for Education Account.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 59-10-1304, a resident or nonresident individual that files an individual income tax return under this chapter may designate on the resident or nonresident individual's individual income tax return a contribution as provided in this section to be:

(a)  deposited into the Invest More for Education Account; and

(b)  expended as provided in Subsection 53A-16-101(4).

(2)  The commission shall:

(a)  determine the total amount of contributions designated in accordance with this section for a taxable year; and

(b)  credit the amount described in Subsection (2)(a) to the Invest More for Education Account created in Subsection 53A-16-101(4).



Enacted by Chapter 235, 2013 General Session

